Illinois, session 104th, SB1405.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 15-169.1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-169.1 new)7    Sec. 15-169.1. Homestead exemption for surviving spouse of 8a police officer or firefighter.9    (a) Beginning with taxable year 2026, an annual homestead 10exemption, limited to a reduction of $5,000 from the equalized 11assessed value of the property, is granted for property that 12is used as a qualified residence by the surviving spouse of a 13police officer or firefighter who is killed in the line of duty 14on or after January 1, 2026, as long as the spouse holds the 15legal or beneficial title to the homestead, permanently 16resides thereon, and does not remarry. If the surviving spouse 17sells the property, an exemption not to exceed the amount 18granted from the most recent ad valorem tax roll may be 19transferred to his or her new residence as long as it is used 20as his or her primary residence and he or she does not remarry. 21    (b) If a homestead exemption is granted under this 22Section, and the qualifying surviving spouse subsequently 23becomes a resident of a facility licensed under the Nursing   SB1405- 2 -LRB104 03812 HLH 13836 b1Home Care Act or a facility operated by the United States 2Department of Veterans Affairs, then the exemption shall 3continue so long as the residence remains unoccupied but is 4still owned by the person who qualified for the homestead 5exemption. 6    (c) Each taxpayer who has been granted an exemption under 7this Section must reapply on an annual basis. Application must 8be made during the application period in effect for the county 9of his or her residence. The assessor or chief county 10assessment officer may determine the eligibility of 11residential property to receive the homestead exemption 12provided by this Section by application, visual inspection, 13questionnaire, or other reasonable methods. The determination 14must be made in accordance with guidelines established by the 15Department. 16    (d) As used in this Section: 17    "Firefighter" means: (i) a person who is a "firefighter" 18or "fireman" as defined in Sections 4-106 or 6-106 of the 19Illinois Pension Code; (ii) a paramedic employed by a unit of 20local government; or (iii) an EMT, emergency medical 21technician-intermediate (EMT-I), or advanced emergency medical 22technician (A-EMT) employed by a unit of local government. 23    "Police officer" means: a policeman, as defined in Section 2410-3-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code; a conservation police 25officer; a sheriff or deputy sheriff; or a law enforcement 26officer employed by the State Police, the Secretary of State,   SB1405- 3 -LRB104 03812 HLH 13836 b1or any other State agency, college, or university. 2    "Qualified residence" means real property, but less any 3portion of that property that is used for commercial purposes, 4with an equalized assessed value of less than $250,000 that is 5owned and occupied as the primary residence of the surviving 6spouse of a police officer or firefighter killed in the line of 7duty, if that spouse is liable for paying real estate taxes on 8the property and is an owner of record of the property or has a 9legal or equitable interest therein, as evidenced by a written 10instrument. In the case of a leasehold interest in the 11property, the lease must be for a single family residence. 12Property rented for more than 6 months is presumed to be used 13for commercial purposes.  14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.